Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 946 (2) 91 as/js/md H.F. 946 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 27A.12 Failure to comply. 1 1. Any law enforcement officer, including an elected 2 sheriff, who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply 3 with the requirements of this chapter shall be subject to 4 investigation by the attorney general as provided in section 5 27A.8. 6 2. A law enforcement officer subject to investigation 7 under subsection 1 shall be given the opportunity to comply 8 with the requirements of this chapter. Upon a determination 9 by the attorney general that a complaint submitted pursuant 10 to subsection 1 alleging a violation of this section is 11 valid, a law enforcement officer refusing to comply with the 12 requirements of this chapter may have the officerâs case 13 referred to the Iowa law enforcement academy council, pursuant 14 to section 80B.13A, with a recommendation for revocation of the 15 officerâs certification. 16 -1- HF 946 (2) 91 as/js/md 1/ 1